Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-323 Separate accounts. (a) A
life insurer, after adoption of a resolution by its board of directors and
certification thereof to the commissioner, may allocate to one or more separate
accounts, in accordance with the terms of a written agreement or a contract on
a variable basis, amounts which are paid to the insurer, in connection with a
pension, retirement or profit sharing plan, or in connection with a contract on
a variable basis, whether on an individual or group basis, and which amounts are
to be applied to purchase retirement benefits in fixed or in variable dollar
amounts, or both, or to provide benefits in accordance with a contract on a
variable basis.

The income, if any, and gains or losses
realized or unrealized on each account may be credited to or charged against
the amount allocated to the account in accordance with the agreement, without
regard to the other income, gains or losses of the insurer. The commissioner
may prescribe reasonable limitations on charges against and permissible
deductions from the investment experience credited to life insurance contracts
on a variable basis. Notwithstanding any other provision in the insurer's
articles of incorporation or in this code, the amounts allocated to the
accounts and accumulations thereon may be invested and reinvested in any class
of loans and investments specified in the agreement, or, with respect to life
insurance contracts on a variable basis, as prescribed by the commissioner, and
the loans and investments shall not be considered in applying any limitation in
this article. The commissioner, with respect to separate accounts for life
insurance on a variable basis, may establish reasonable standards for
procedures to be used in changing investment policy and provisions to safeguard
the rights of insured persons and beneficiaries.

(b) Contract on a variable basis means a
contract issued by an insurer providing for the dollar amount of benefits or
other contractual payments or values thereunder to vary so as to reflect
investment results of a segregated portfolio of investments or of a designated
account in which amounts received in connection with the contract have been
placed and other contracts as may be approved by the commissioner.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, a life insurer, if necessary to comply with the Investment Company Act of
1940, with respect to any account or any portion thereof, may:

(1) Exercise the voting rights of the stock or shares
or interest in accordance with instructions from the persons having the
beneficial interests in the account ratably according to their respective
interests in the account, or

(2) Establish a committee for the account, the
members of which may be directors or officers or other employees of the
insurer, persons having no relationship to the insurer, or any combination
thereof, who may be elected to membership by the vote of the persons having the
beneficial interests in the account ratably according to their respective
interests in the account. The committee alone, in conjunction with others, or
by delegation to the insurer or any other person, as investment manager or
investment adviser, may authorize purchases and sales of investments for the
account if, as long as the life insurer or any subsidiary or affiliate of the
life insurer is the investment manager or investment adviser of the account,
the investments of the account are eligible under this section. If compliance
with the Investment Company Act of 1940 involves only a portion of the account,
the insurer may establish a committee for only that portion, and its members
may be elected by the vote of the persons having the beneficial interests in
the portion. A committee for only a portion of the account may be given the
further power to require the subdivision of the account into two accounts so
that the portion of the account with respect to which the committee is acting
shall constitute a separate account. If the committee so requires, the insurer
shall segregate, from the account being so subdivided, a portion of each asset
held with respect to the reserve liabilities of the account. That portion
shall be in the same proportion to the total of the asset as the reserve
liability for the portion of the account with respect to which the committee is
acting bears to the total reserve liability of the account; and notwithstanding
any other provision of law, the assets so segregated shall be transferred to a
separate account with respect to which the committee shall act.

(d) The investments and liabilities of the
account shall at all times be clearly identifiable and distinguishable from the
other investments and liabilities of the insurer. A sale, transfer, or
exchange of investments shall not be made between any of the separate accounts
or between any other investment account of the company and one or more of the
separate accounts, except for the purpose of:

(1) Conducting the business of the account in
accordance with subsections (a) and (c); or

(2) Making adjustments necessitated by the contract
for mortality experience adjustment, and then only if the transfers are made by
a transfer of cash or by a transfer of securities having a valuation that can
readily be determined in the marketplace. The commissioner may require for
domestic life insurers that a transfer of cash or investments from a separate
account or accounts to the company be approved in advance of the transfer. The
commissioner may prescribe reasonable limitations on charges against and
permissible deductions from separate accounts for life insurance contracts on a
variable basis.

(e) As used in this section, Investment
Company Act of 1940 means the Act of Congress approved August 22, 1940,
entitled Investment Company Act of 1940 as amended from time to time, or any
similar statute enacted in substitution therefor.

(f) The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91. [L 1987, c 349, §5; am L 2004, c 122, §21]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next